District of Columbia statutes.
22-3225.04

Penalties.

(a)

Any person convicted of insurance fraud in the first degree shall be fined not more than the amount set forth in § 22-3571.01 or imprisoned for not more than 15 years, or both.

(b)

(1)

Except as provided in paragraph (2) of this subsection, any person convicted of insurance fraud in the second degree shall be fined not more than the amount set forth in § 22-3571.01 or imprisoned for not more than 5 years, or both.

(2)

Any person convicted of insurance fraud in the second degree who has been convicted previously of insurance fraud pursuant to § 22-3225.02 or § 22-3225.03, or a felony conviction based on similar grounds in any other jurisdiction, shall be fined not more than the amount set forth in § 22-3571.01 or imprisoned for not more than 10 years, or both.

(c)

Any person convicted of misdemeanor insurance fraud shall be fined not more than the amount set forth in § 22-3571.01 or imprisoned for not more than 180 days, or both.

(d)

A person convicted of a felony violation of this subchapter shall be disqualified from engaging in the business of insurance, subject to 18 U.S.C. § 1033(e)(2).

History

Dec. 1, 1982, D.C. Law 4-164, § 125d
as added Apr. 27, 1999, D.C. Law 12-273, § 2, 46 DCR 1132
June 19, 2001, D.C. Law 13-313, § 12(a), 48 DCR 1873
July 25, 2006, D.C. Law 16-144, § 2(d), 53 DCR 2838
June 11, 2013, D.C. Law 19-317, § 205(l), 60 DCR 2064

Section References

This section is referenced in § 22-3225.05.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 22-3825.4.

Effect of Amendments

D.C. Law 13-313, in subsec. (b)(2), validated a previously made technical correction.
D.C. Law 16-144 rewrote the section.
The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 19-317 substituted “not more than the amount set forth in § 22-3571.01” for “not more than $50,000” in (a), for “not more than $10,000” in (b)(1), for “not more than $20,000” in (b)(2), and for “not more than $1,000” in (c).

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 205(l) of the Criminal Fine Proportionality Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-45, April 1, 2013, 60 DCR 5400, 20 DCSTAT 1300).

Editor's Notes

Applicability of D.C. Law 19-317: Section 401 of D.C. Law 19-317 provided that the act shall apply only to offenses committed on or after June 11, 2013.